Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Division 1. Requests and Proposals for Construction of Irrigation Works

§ 36-7-301.
Requisites; contents.

Any person, company of persons, association or incorporated company constructing, having constructed or desiring to construct ditches, canals or other irrigation works to reclaim land under the provisions of this act shall file with the board a request for the selection on behalf of the state by the board, of the land to be reclaimed, designating said land by legal subdivisions. This request shall be accompanied by a proposal to construct the ditch, canal or other irrigation works necessary for the complete reclamation of the land asked to be selected. The proposal shall be prepared in accordance with the rules of the board and with the regulations of the department of the interior. It shall state the source of water supply, the location and dimensions of the proposed works, the estimated cost thereof, the price and terms per acre, at which perpetual water rights will be sold to settlers on the land to be reclaimed, said perpetual rights to embrace a proportionate interest in the canal or other irrigation works, together with all rights and franchises attached thereto. In the case of incorporated companies, it shall state the name of the company, the purpose of its incorporation, the names and places of residence of its directors and officers, the amount of its authorized and its paid-up capital. If the applicant is not an incorporated company, the proposal shall set forth the name or names of the party or parties, and such other facts as will enable the board to determine his or their financial ability to carry out the proposed undertaking.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 38, § 7; R.S. 1899, § 940; C.S. 1910, § 666; C.S. 1920, § 775; R.S. 1931, § 91-707; C.S. 1945, § 24-406; W.S. 1957, § 36-94.

Cross references. —

As to public works and contracts, see §

16-6-101

et seq.

As to irrigation generally, see chapter 5 of title 41.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note following §

36-7-103

.

Reclamation corporation. —

Corporation organized for purpose of reclaiming lands patented by state from United States and held by state for benefit of public desiring to settle on lands reclaimed is not strictly a private corporation, and court had jurisdiction, on company becoming insolvent, to appoint receiver over its property as going concern, on petition by judgment creditor. State ex rel. Avenius v. Tidball, 35 Wyo. 496, 252 P. 499,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1927).

Substitution of acreage. —

Under administrative law concerning storage water, irrigable acreage may be substituted for nonirrigable acreage included in original reservoir project. Anderson v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 60 Wyo. 417, 154 P.2d 318,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1944).

Cited

in

Lakeview Canal Co. v. R. Hardesty Mfg. Co., 31 Wyo. 182, 224 P. 853,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(1924).

§ 36-7-302.
Guaranty; forfeiture.

The board shall have authority to prescribe that each request and proposal shall be accompanied by a certified check in an amount to be designated by the board, the same to be held as a guarantee of the execution of the contract with the state in accordance with its terms by the parties submitting such proposals, in case of the approval of the same and selection of the land by the board and to be forfeited to the state in case of failure of said parties to enter into a contract with the state in accordance with the provisions of this act.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 38, § 8; 1899, ch. 6, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 941; C.S. 1910, § 667; C.S. 1920, § 776; R.S. 1931, § 91-708; C.S. 1945, § 24-407; W.S. 1957, § 36-95.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note following §

36-7-103

.

§ 36-7-303.
Application for permit to appropriate water.

The person, company of persons, association or incorporated company, making application to the board for the selection of lands by the state, shall have filed with the state engineer an application for a permit to appropriate water for the reclamation of the lands described in the request to the board. This application shall be prepared in conformity with the provisions of W.S.

41-3-613

,

41-3-615

,

41-4-501

through

41-4-512

and

41-4-517

, except that the time for beginning construction, as specified by W.S.

41-4-506

thereof, shall begin within one (1) year from the date the lands, described in the said request to the board, are segregated to the state. The maps showing the proposed irrigation works and the lands to be irrigated shall be prepared in accordance with the regulations of the state engineer’s office and the rules of the department of the interior.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 38, § 9; R.S. 1899, § 942; Laws 1905, ch. 79, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 668; C.S. 1920, § 778; R.S. 1931, § 91-710; C.S. 1945, § 24-408; W.S. 1957, § 36-96.

Rights of appropriators limited. —

Common carrier of water is the agent or trustee of the actual appropriators who put water to beneficial use, and the rights of the latter are limited by contract with carrier as well as by provisions of law. State v. Laramie Rivers Co., 59 Wyo. 9, 136 P.2d 487,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1943).

Stated

in

Bruegman v. Johnson Ranches, Inc., 520 P.2d 489,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 193

(Wyo. 1974).

Cited

in

Dechert v. Christopulos, 604 P.2d 1039,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 223

(Wyo. 1980).

§ 36-7-304.
Examination.

Immediately upon receipt of any request and proposal, as designated in W.S.

36-7-301

, it shall be the duty of the director of the office of state lands and investments to examine the same, and ascertain if it complies with the rules of the board and the regulations of the department of the interior. If it does not, it is to be returned for correction, but if it does so comply, the director shall cause to be examined by an engineer in his office, the maps, plans, specifications and surveys, to determine whether or not the proposed works are feasible, whether the proposed irrigation system is practicable and the best that can be provided for the reclamation of said lands, whether there is sufficient unappropriated water in the source of supply to furnish an ample supply of water for the irrigation and reclamation of the lands described in such proposal, whether the capacity of the proposed works is adequate to reclaim the lands described, whether or not the proposed cost of construction is reasonable, considering the area of land to be reclaimed, and whether or not the lands proposed to be irrigated are desert in character, and such as may be properly set apart under the provisions of the aforesaid act of congress and the rules and regulations of the department of the interior thereunder. Whenever the director shall deem it necessary to obtain the desired information, he shall cause a field examination of such project to be made by an engineer from his office. The state engineer shall afford to the director or the engineers in his office, every facility to examine the records and files of the state engineer’s office to obtain the desired information, and upon request of the director, and without charge, shall furnish all information as to water permits issued, and concerning the water supply for such proposed irrigation system, and furnish such reports as may be called for by the director, or the interior department.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 38, § 10; R.S. 1899, § 943; C.S. 1910, § 669; Laws 1913, ch. 117, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 779; R.S. 1931, § 91-711; C.S. 1945, § 24-409; W.S. 1957, § 36-97; Laws 1992, ch. 55, § 3; 1998, ch. 13, § 1.

Federal act. —

As to meaning of “aforesaid act of congress,” referred to in the second sentence, see note catchlined “Carey Act” following chapter heading.

§ 36-7-305.
Submission for consideration; approval.

Whenever the director shall have made the investigation of such request and proposal as he deems necessary, he shall submit such request and proposal, with the report of such investigation, to the board for its consideration. In case of approval, the board shall instruct the director to file in the local land office, a request for the withdrawal of the land described in said proposal.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 38, § 11; R.S. 1899, § 944; C.S. 1910, § 670; Laws 1913, ch. 117, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 780; R.S. 1931, § 91-712; C.S. 1945, § 24-410; W.S. 1957, § 36-98; Laws 1992, ch. 55, § 3.

§ 36-7-306.
Notification of nonapproval; resubmission.

When requests and proposals are not approved by the board, the board shall notify the parties making such proposal of such action, and the reason therefor. The parties so notified shall have sixty (60) days in which to submit a satisfactory proposal, but the board may, at its discretion, extend the time to six (6) months.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 38, § 12; R.S. 1899, § 945; C.S. 1910, § 671; C.S. 1920, § 782; R.S. 1931, § 91-714; C.S. 1945, § 24-412; W.S. 1957 § 36-99.